Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB899.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13(a) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended by adding a clause and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 13. Prohibited Acts; Penalties.--(a) The following acts and the causing thereof within the Commonwealth are hereby prohibited:* * *<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122 (41) (i) The preparation, manufacture, sale or distribution of a kratom product to a minor that meets any of the following criteria:(A) The kratom product is mixed or packed with a nonkratom substance and the substance affects the quality or strength of the kratom product to a degree that renders the kratom product injurious to a consumer of the kratom product.(B) The kratom product contains a poisonous or otherwise deleterious nonkratom ingredient, including, but not limited to, any of the following:(I) A controlled substance listed under section 4.(II) A controlled substance listed under 28 Pa. Code Ch. 25 Subch. A (relating to controlled substances, drugs, devices and cosmetics).(III) A substance that is temporarily scheduled as a controlled substance by the secretary under section 3(d).(C) The kratom product contains a kratom extract with levels of residual solvents higher than the standards specified in the current edition of the United States Pharmacopeia/National Formulary (USP/NF) 467 on the effective date of this clause.(D) The kratom product contains a level of 7-hydroxymitragynine in the alkaloid fraction that is greater than 2% of the overall alkaloid composition of the kratom product.(E) The kratom product contains a synthetic alkaloid, including a synthetic mitragynine, a synthetic 7-hydroxymitragynine or any other synthetically derived compounds of the kratom plant.(F) The kratom product does not include adequate labeling directions necessary for the safe and effective use by a consumer of the kratom product, including a recommended serving 20250SB0899PN1319 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 size.(ii) A retailer shall not be subject to criminal liability under this clause if, by a preponderance of the evidence, the retailer acted in good faith reliance upon a processor that the kratom product was not in violation of this clause.(iii) The following words and phrases when used in this clause shall have the meanings given to them in this subclause unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Food product" means a food, food ingredient, dietary ingredient, dietary supplement or beverage for human consumption."Kratom extract" means a food product that contains any part of a leaf from mitragyna speciosa, commonly known as kratom, which has been extracted and concentrated to provide more standardized dosing."Kratom product" means a food product that contains any part of a leaf from mitragyna speciosa, commonly known as kratom, or a kratom extract, and is manufactured as a powder, capsule, pill, beverage or any other edible form."Processor" means a person who prepares or manufactures a kratom product or who advertises, represents or holds oneself out as preparing or manufacturing a kratom product. The term does not include a retailer."Retailer" means a person who sells or distributes a kratom product or who advertises, represents or holds oneself out as selling or distributing a kratom product. The term does not include a processor.* * *(q) (1) Any person who knowingly or intentionally violates subsection (a)(41) and is a processor is guilty of a misdemeanor 20250SB0899PN1319 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the first degree.(2) Any person who knowingly or intentionally violates subsection (a)(41) and is not a processor is guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree.SECTION 1. SECTION 4(1) OF THE ACT OF APRIL 14, 1972 (P.L.233, NO.64), KNOWN AS THE CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE, DRUG, DEVICE AND COSMETIC ACT, IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBCLAUSE TO READ:SECTION 4. SCHEDULES OF CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES.--THE FOLLOWING SCHEDULES INCLUDE THE CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES LISTED OR TO BE LISTED BY WHATEVER OFFICIAL NAME, COMMON OR USUAL NAME, CHEMICAL NAME, OR TRADE NAME DESIGNATED.(1) SCHEDULE I--IN DETERMINING THAT A SUBSTANCE COMES WITHIN THIS SCHEDULE, THE SECRETARY SHALL FIND: A HIGH POTENTIAL FOR ABUSE, NO CURRENTLY ACCEPTED MEDICAL USE IN THE UNITED STATES, AND A LACK OF ACCEPTED SAFETY FOR USE UNDER MEDICAL SUPERVISION. THE FOLLOWING CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES ARE INCLUDED IN THIS SCHEDULE:* * *(IX) ANY MATERIAL, COMPOUND, MIXTURE OR PREPARATION THAT CONTAINS 7-HYDROXYMITRAGYNINE IN A CONCENTRATION EQUAL TO OR EXCEEDING 2% OF THE TOTAL ALKALOID CONTENT OR 1 MILLIGRAM PER RECOMMENDED SERVING SIZE, OR ANY SYNTHETIC, SEMI-SYNTHETIC OR CHEMICALLY MANIPULATED FORM OF MITRAGYNINE, 7-HYDROXYMITRAGYNINE, MITRAGYNINE PSEUDOINDOXYL OR ANY OTHER SYNTHETIC, SEMI-SYNTHETIC OR CHEMICALLY MANIPULATED ALKALOID, METABOLITE, DERIVATIVE OR ANALOGUE OF THE MITRAGYNA SPECIOSA PLANT.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0899PN1319 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930